test/src/morphology/V-poltw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - pȯļtõ: # Verb 22 'eng /est reht peksta/fin' - full paradigm
     pȯļtõ+V+Inf: pȯļtõ
     pȯļtõ+V+Ger: pȯļtõs
     pȯļtõ+V+Sup: pūoļtam
     pȯļtõ+V+Sup+Ine: pūoļtamõs
     pȯļtõ+V+Sup+Ela: pūoļtamõst
     pȯļtõ+V+Sup+Tra: pūoļtamõks
     pȯļtõ+V+Sup+Abe: pūoļtamõt
     pȯļtõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pūoļtab
     pȯļtõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pūoļtat
     pȯļtõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pūoļtabõd
     pȯļtõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pūoļtiz
     pȯļtõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [pūoļtizt, pūoļtiztõ]
     pȯļtõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [pūoļtizt, pūoļtiztõ]
     pȯļtõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: pȯļt
     pȯļtõ+V+Cond+Sg3: pūoļtaks
     pȯļtõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: pūoļta
     pȯļtõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: pȯļtõ
     pȯļtõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: pūoļtagid
     pȯļtõ+V+Jus+Sg3: pūoļtag
     pȯļtõ+V+QuoSg3: pūoļtaji
     pȯļtõ+V+ActPrfPrc: pȯļtõn
     pȯļtõ+V+PssPrfPrc: pȯļtõd
